Oklahoma, session 2025, SB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 930.12 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any person receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive
benefits on or after the effective date of this act shall receive a
two percent (2%) increase in benefits.

60-1-1728 RD 2/27/2025 9:32:55 AM



Req. No. 1728 Page 1